Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.040

Terms of members—Vacancies.

All members appointed to the commission by the governor shall be appointed for terms of six years, such terms to commence on July first, and expire on June thirtieth. However, for members first appointed as a result of chapter 323, Laws of 2021, the governor shall appoint members to terms ranging from two years to six years in order to stagger future appointments. Any member chosen to fill a vacancy created otherwise than by expiration of term shall be appointed for the unexpired term of the member the appointee is to succeed. Any member may be reappointed for additional terms.

[ 2021 c 323 s 4; 2009 c 549 s 5167; 1974 ex.s. c 94 s 4.]